apertium-nn-nb.nn.dix
<pardef n="vas/sen__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>nare</l>  <r>sen<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>si</l>    <r>sen<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sen</l>   <r>sen<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>se</l>    <r>sen<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>sent</l>  <r>sen<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>si</l>    <r>sen<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ne</l>    <r>sen<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ne</l>    <r>sen<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>naste</l> <r>sen<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>nast</l>  <r>sen<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="svart__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>are</l>       <r><s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r><s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r><s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aste</l>      <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ast</l>       <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="heilag__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>are</l>   <r><s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>      <r><s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>     <r><s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>     <r><s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>     <r><s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>aste</l>  <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ste</l>   <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ast</l>   <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>st</l>    <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="sak/leg__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>leg</l>          <r>leg<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>leg</l>          <r>leg<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>lege</l>         <r>leg<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>lege</l>         <r>leg<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>legare</l>       <r>leg<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>legast</l>       <r>leg<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>legaste</l>      <r>leg<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>lig</l>          <r>leg<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>lig</l>          <r>leg<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>lige</l>         <r>leg<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>lige</l>         <r>leg<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ligare</l>       <r>leg<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ligast</l>       <r>leg<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ligaste</l>      <r>leg<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="bortse/dd__adj">
  <e><p><l>dde</l>        <r>dd<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>dde</l>        <r>dd<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>dd</l> <r>dd<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>tt</l> <r>dd<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="van/d__adj">
  <!-- both 'vand' and 'vant' in norsk ordbank -->
  <e r="LR"><p><l>dare</l>  <r>d<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tare</l>  <r>d<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>d</l>     <r>d<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>t</l>     <r>d<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>d</l>     <r>d<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>     <r>d<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>de</l>    <r>d<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>te</l>    <r>d<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>de</l>    <r>d<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>te</l>    <r>d<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>daste</l> <r>d<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>taste</l> <r>d<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>dast</l>  <r>d<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tast</l>  <r>d<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="fåfeng/d__adj">
  <!-- both 'fåfengd' and 'fåfengt' lemmas in norsk ordbank -->
  <e>       <p><l>tare</l>  <r>d<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>t</l>     <r>d<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>	    <p><l>d</l>	    <r>d<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>	    <p><l>t</l>	    <r>d<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>	    <p><l>de</l>    <r>d<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>te</l>    <r>d<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>	    <p><l>de</l>    <r>d<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>te</l>    <r>d<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>	    <p><l>taste</l> <r>d<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>	    <p><l>tast</l>  <r>d<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="OK__adj">
  <e>       <p><l></l>      <r><s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>      <r><s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>      <r><s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>      <r><s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="første__adj">
  <e>       <p><l></l>      <r><s n="adj"/><s n="ord"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>      <r><s n="adj"/><s n="ord"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>      <r><s n="adj"/><s n="ord"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>      <r><s n="adj"/><s n="ord"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<!-- /adjectives -->

	</pardefs>

<e lm="fåfengd">	 <i>fåfeng</i><par n="fåfeng/d__adj"/></e>
<e lm="bosnisk">         <i>bosnisk</i><par n="svart__adj"/></e>
<e lm="faktisk">         <i>faktisk</i><par n="svart__adj"/></e>
<e lm="hygienisk">       <i>hygienisk</i><par n="svart__adj"/></e>
<e lm="kompetent">       <i>kompetent</i><par n="svart__adj"/></e>
<e lm="mordarisk">       <i>morderisk</i><par n="svart__adj"/></e>
<e lm="platt">           <i>platt</i><par n="svart__adj"/></e>
<e lm="sart">            <i>sart</i><par n="svart__adj"/></e>
<e lm="symptomatisk">    <i>symptomatisk</i><par n="svart__adj"/></e>
<e lm="utslått">         <i>utslått</i><par n="svart__adj"/></e>
<e lm="vand">            <i>van</i><par n="van/d__adj"/></e>
<e lm="særskild">        <i>særskil</i><par n="van/d__adj"/></e>
<e lm="tillitsvald">     <i>tillitsval</i><par n="van/d__adj"/></e>
<e lm="folkevald">       <i>folkeval</i><par n="van/d__adj"/></e>
<e lm="utvald">          <i>utval</i><par n="van/d__adj"/></e>
<e lm="bortskjemd">      <i>bortskjem</i><par n="van/d__adj"/></e>
<e lm="førnemnd">        <i>førnemn</i><par n="van/d__adj"/></e>
<e lm="sistnemnd">       <i>sistnemn</i><par n="van/d__adj"/></e>
<e lm="velkjend">        <i>velkjen</i><par n="van/d__adj"/></e>
<e lm="uavgjord">        <i>uavgjor</i><par n="fåfeng/d__adj"/></e>
<e lm="forseggjord">     <i>forseggjor</i><par n="fåfeng/d__adj"/></e>
<e lm="uoppgjord">       <i>uoppgjor</i><par n="fåfeng/d__adj"/></e>
<e lm="unnagjord">       <i>unnagjor</i><par n="fåfeng/d__adj"/></e>
<e lm="tilgjord">        <i>tilgjor</i><par n="fåfeng/d__adj"/></e>
<e lm="sjølvsagd">       <i>sjølvsag</i><par n="fåfeng/d__adj"/></e>
<e lm="fornuftig">       <i>fornuftig</i><par n="svart__adj"/></e>
<e lm="tilfeldig">       <i>tilfeldig</i><par n="svart__adj"/></e>
<e lm="dårleg">          <i>dår</i><par n="sak/leg__adj"/></e>
<e lm="forståeleg">      <i>forståe</i><par n="sak/leg__adj"/></e>
<e lm="hovudsakleg">     <i>hovudsak</i><par n="sak/leg__adj"/></e>
<e lm="løynleg">         <i>løyn</i><par n="sak/leg__adj"/></e>
<e lm="påliteleg">       <i>pålite</i><par n="sak/leg__adj"/></e>
<e lm="smerteleg">       <i>smerte</i><par n="sak/leg__adj"/></e>
<e lm="truleg">		 <i>tru</i><par n="sak/leg__adj"/></e>
<e lm="umuleg">          <i>umu</i><par n="sak/leg__adj"/></e>
<e lm="utruleg">	 <i>utru</i><par n="sak/leg__adj"/></e>
<e lm="felleskyrkjeleg"> <i>felleskyrkje</i><par n="sak/leg__adj"/></e>
<e lm="heilag">          <i>heilag</i><par n="heilag__adj"/></e>
<e lm="forpliktande">    <i>forpliktande</i><par n="OK__adj"/></e>
<e lm="levande">         <i>levande</i><par n="OK__adj"/></e>
<e lm="nærgåande">       <i>nærgåande</i><par n="OK__adj"/></e>
<e lm="pågåande">        <i>pågåande</i><par n="OK__adj"/></e>
<e lm="stillesittande">  <i>stillesittande</i><par n="OK__adj"/></e>
<e lm="uttømmande">      <i>uttømmande</i><par n="OK__adj"/></e>
<e lm="einskild">        <i>einskil</i><par n="van/d__adj"/></e>
<e lm="utanbys">         <i>utanbys</i><par n="OK__adj"/></e>
<e lm="oransje">         <i>oransje</i><par n="OK__adj"/></e>
<e lm="in">              <i>in</i><par n="OK__adj"/></e>
<e lm="fransktalande">   <i>fransktalande</i><par n="OK__adj"/></e>
<e lm="regjeringsoppnemnt"><i>regjeringsoppnemn</i><par n="van/d__adj"/></e>
<e lm="satellittbasert"> <i>satellittbasert</i><par n="svart__adj"/></e>
<e lm="eigentleg">        <i>eigent</i><par n="sak/leg__adj"/></e>
<e lm="vassen">          <i>vas</i><par n="vas/sen__adj"/></e>
<e lm="allehande">       <i>allehande</i><par n="OK__adj"/></e>
<e lm="pensjonsgivande"> <i>pensjonsgivande</i><par n="OK__adj"/></e>
<e lm="fastklemd">       <i>fastklem</i><par n="van/d__adj"/></e>
<e lm="mogeleg">        <i>moge</i><par n="sak/leg__adj"/></e>
<e lm="andre">           <i>andre</i><par n="første__adj"/></e>
<e lm="fjerde">          <i>fjerde</i><par n="første__adj"/></e>
<e lm="sjette">          <i>sjette</i><par n="første__adj"/></e>
<e lm="åttande">         <i>åttande</i><par n="første__adj"/></e>
<e lm="tiande">          <i>tiande</i><par n="første__adj"/></e>
<e lm="tolvte">          <i>tolvte</i><par n="første__adj"/></e>
<e lm="fjortande">       <i>fjortande</i><par n="første__adj"/></e>
<e lm="sekstande">       <i>sekstande</i><par n="første__adj"/></e>
<e lm="attande">         <i>attande</i><par n="første__adj"/></e>
<e lm="tjuande">         <i>tjuande</i><par n="første__adj"/></e>
<e lm="sekstiande">         <i>sekstiande</i><par n="første__adj"/></e>
<e lm="[0-9]+.">         <re>[0-9]+</re><i>.</i><par n="første__adj"/></e>
